Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1909.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-3-105 of Title 10A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. To promote fair and objective determinations in cases


involving allegations of child abuse or neglect and prevent


potential bias or doctor shopping by the Department of Human


Services, all proceedings under the Oklahoma Children’s Code that


necessitate a medical evaluator shall use a blind, randomized


selection process for medical evaluators.

Req. No. 3518 Page 1


B. The Office of the Administrative Director of the Courts


shall establish a blind, randomized selection process for medical


evaluators. The office shall implement a blind, random assignment


system from a statewide pool of qualified, independent medical


professionals, including consulting pediatricians and child abuse


specialists. The office shall implement policies and procedures to


ensure impartial evaluations and unbiased medical findings.


C. The Office of the Administrative Director of the Courts


shall maintain a comprehensive audit system documenting all


interactions between Department of Human Services personnel,


consulting pediatricians, and child abuse specialists. This shall


include records of consultation frequency, instances where medical


opinions supported the Department’s positions versus parental


defenses, and justifications for any deviations from randomization.


D. The Attorney General shall investigate violations of the


blind, randomized selection process, may bring civil actions to


enforce this section, and may criminally prosecute violations of


this section. In addition to civil and criminal penalties, the


court may impose sanctions to enforce this section. Licensure


boards may impose disciplinary action on licensees who violate this


section.


E. All medical evaluators involved in child abuse evaluations


shall complete annual review and certification by the Office of the


Administrative Director of the Courts, to include a course

Req. No. 3518 Page 2


emphasizing the paramount importance of parental rights, the


seriousness of arbitrary or capricious child removals, and adherence


to evidence-based practices that prioritize family preservation when


safe and appropriate.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-4-603, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-4-603. A. If the court finds that:


1. The factual allegations in a petition filed by the state


alleging that a child is deprived are supported by a preponderance


of the evidence proof beyond a reasonable doubt;


2. Such allegations are sufficient to support a finding that


the child is deprived; and


3. It is in the best interests of the child that the child be


declared to be a deprived child and made a ward of the court,


then the court shall sustain the petition, and shall make an order


of adjudication finding the child to be deprived and shall adjudge


the child as a ward of the court.


B. The order of adjudication shall include a statement that


advises the parent that failure to appear at any subsequent hearing


or comply with any requirements of the court may result in the


termination of parental rights to the child.


C. When a child has been adjudicated deprived, the court shall


enter a dispositional order pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-


4-707 of this title.

Req. No. 3518 Page 3


D. When a child has been adjudicated deprived, the parent or


other legal custodian shall register with the court clerk within two


(2) days of the adjudication and provide a valid, current address or


other place where the parent or other legal custodian may be served


with a summons. In the event that the address or place where the


parent or legal custodian may be served a summons changes during the


course of the litigation, the parent or other legal custodian shall


have the obligation of filing a change of address form with the


clerk. In the event that an amended petition or motion is filed,


the address listed on the form of the court clerk shall constitute


the last-known address of the parent or other legal custodian unless


the state has actual knowledge of the parent or other legal


custodian’s location.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3518 DC 1/15/2026 8:44:08 AM

















Req. No. 3518 Page 4